Missouri, session 2026, HB2373.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.709, to read as follows:
191.709. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Dismiss", to terminate an established physician-patient relationship;
(2) "Health care provider", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(3) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(4) "Vaccination status", a minor child's status with regard to whether the child
has received a vaccination against one or more diseases.
2. A health care provider shall not refuse, withhold from, or deny a minor child
any health care service based on the child's vaccination status.
3. A physician or physician group in a medical practice shall not dismiss a minor
child patient from the practice based on the willingness or refusal to consent to
vaccination of the child on the part of the parent or other person authorized to consent
for the child.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.